Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2314.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Artificial Intelligence Public Education Campaign Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Artificial intelligence" or "AI."(1) A machine-based system that can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions, recommendations or decisions influencing real or virtual environments, including the ability to:1234567891011121314151617 (i) perceive real and virtual environments;(ii) abstract perceptions made under this paragraph into models through analysis in an automated manner; and(iii) use model inference to formulate options for information or action based on outcomes under subparagraphs (i) and (ii).(2) The term includes generative artificial intelligence."Forged digital likeness." As defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 4101.1(f) (relating to digital forgery)."Generative artificial intelligence." The class of models that emulate the structure and characteristics of input data in order to generate derived synthetic content, including information such as images, videos, audio clips or text, that has been significantly modified or generated by algorithms, including by artificial intelligence."Office." The Office of Attorney General.Section 3. Public education campaign.(a) Duties.--Subject to funding being available, no later than one year after the effective date of this subsection, the office shall conduct a public education campaign to provide information to the general public about artificial intelligence and to improve AI consumer literacy. The public education campaign may include, but need not be limited to, public service announcements through a variety of media, including television, radio, print and the office's publicly accessible Internet website.(b) Audience.--The public education campaign shall target the general public and populations identified by the office as having lower rates of AI consumer literacy, being particularly 20260HB2314PN3066 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 susceptible to AI-enabled scams and frauds or being particularly vulnerable to negative impacts from content generated by artificial intelligence.(c) Contents.--The office shall ensure that the public education campaign under this section includes:(1) Identifying, promoting and encouraging the use of best practices for identifying the provenance of digital content and whether it has been generated or significantly modified by algorithms, including artificial intelligence. This shall include guidance on methods for detecting or differentiating media that is a forged digital likeness.(2) Information on avoiding artificial intelligence-enabled scams and frauds.(3) Responsible behavior when engaging with generative artificial intelligence programs commonly referred to as "chatbots."(4) Best practices for the protection of personal data and personally identifiable information when engaging with artificial intelligence programs.(5) Awareness of the potential for bias and misinformation when interacting with programs using generative artificial intelligence.(6) Information regarding potential harm to children who use AI applications and best practices for parents or guardians to prevent that potential harm.Section 4. Administration.(a) Funding.--The General Assembly may appropriate funding as necessary to effectuate this act.(b) Report.--Within one year of the start of the public education campaign under section 3(a), the office shall submit a 20260HB2314PN3066 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 report on the public education campaign to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Communications and Technology Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Communications and Technology Committee of the House of Representatives. The report shall include a summary of the public education campaign, an assessment of its performance and impact and recommendations on further action to achieve the public education goals of the campaign.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2314PN3066 - 4 - 12345678910